Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.18
Title IV-D child support order; communication technology; use authorized.

A court may use any available technology that would allow the parties to communicate with each other to conduct a hearing or any proceeding required pursuant to sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.17.

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 19.